Virginia statutes. Title 30. General Assembly.
Chapter 54. Medicaid Innovation and Reform Commission.

The number of this chapter

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission. The 2013 act gave no chapter heading or number.

§ 30-347.
Medicaid Innovation and Reform Commission; membership; terms; compensation and expenses; definition.

The Medicaid Innovation and Reform Commission (the Commission) is established as a commission in the legislative branch of state government. The purpose of the Commission shall be to review, recommend and approve innovation and reform proposals affecting the implementation of Title XIX and Title XXI of the Social Security Act, including eligibility and financing for proposals set out in Item 307 of Chapter 806 of the 2013 Acts of Assembly. Specifically, the Commission shall review (i) the development of reform proposals; (ii) progress in obtaining federal approval for reforms such as benefit design, service delivery, payment reform, and quality and cost containment outcomes; and (iii) implementation of reform measures.

The Commission shall consist of 12 members as follows: the chair of the House Committee on Appropriations, or his designee, and four members of the House Committee on Appropriations appointed by the chair and the chair of the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations, or his designee, and four members of the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations appointed by the chair. In addition, the Secretaries of Finance and Health and Human Resources shall serve as ex officio, nonvoting members of the Commission.

Members shall serve terms coincident with their terms of office. Vacancies for unexpired terms shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments. Members may be reappointed for successive terms.

The members of the Commission shall elect a chairman and vice chairman annually. A majority of the voting members of the Commission shall constitute a quorum. The meetings of the Commission shall be held at the call of the chairman or whenever the majority of the members so request. The Commission shall meet bimonthly beginning in June 2013, or as soon as possible thereafter.
D. 1. The members of the Commission shall elect a chairman and vice chairman annually. A majority of the voting members of the Commission shall constitute a quorum. The meetings of the Commission shall be held at the call of the chairman or whenever the majority of the members so request. The Commission shall meet bimonthly beginning in June 2013, or as soon as possible thereafter.

An affirmative vote by three of the five members of the Commission from the House of Delegates and three of the five members of the Commission from the Senate shall be required to endorse any reform proposal to amend the State Plan for Medical Assistance under Title XIX of the Social Security Act, and any waivers thereof, to implement coverage for newly eligible individuals pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 1396d(y)(1)[2010] of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act.

Legislative members of the Commission shall receive such compensation as provided in§ 30-19.12, and nonlegislative members shall receive such compensation as provided in §

2.2-2813

.

History.

2013, c. 806.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2013 act having been § 30-339.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, in subsection A, “Item 307 of Chapter 806 of the 2013 Acts of Assembly” was substituted for “Item 307 of this act.”

Acts 2017, c. 836, as amended by Acts 2018, Sp. Sess. I, c. 1, cl. 2, Item 306 JJJ, which expires at midnight June 30, 2018, provides: “1. The Department of Medical Assistance Services shall seek federal authority through any necessary waiver(s) and/or State Plan authorization under Titles XIX and XXI of the Social Security Act to implement a comprehensive value-driven, market-based reform of the Virginia Medicaid/FAMIS programs.

“2. The department is authorized to contract with qualified health plans to offer recipients a Medicaid benefit package adhering to these principles. Any coordination of non-traditional behavioral health services covered under contract with qualified health plans or through other means shall adhere to the principles outlined in paragraph MM. c. This reformed service delivery model shall be mandatory, to the extent allowed under the relevant authority granted by the federal government and shall, at a minimum, include (i) limited high-performing provider networks and medical/health homes; (ii) financial incentives for high quality outcomes and alternative payment methods; (iii) improvements to encounter data submission, reporting, and oversight; (iv) standardization of administrative and other processes for providers; and (v) support of the health information exchange.

“3. The Department of Medical Assistance Services shall seek reforms to include all remaining Medicaid populations and services, including long-term care and home- and community-based waiver services into cost-effective, managed and coordinated delivery systems. The department shall begin designing the process and obtaining federal authority to transition all remaining Medicaid beneficiaries into a coordinated delivery system. DMAS shall promulgate regulations to implement these provisions to be effective within 280 days of its enactment. The department may implement any changes necessary to implement these provisions prior to the promulgation of regulations undertaken in order to effect such changes.

“4.a. Notwithstanding § 30-347, Code of Virginia, or any other provision of law, no later than 45 days upon the passage of House Bill 5001, the Department of Medical Assistance Services shall have the authority to (1) amend the State Plan for Medical Assistance under Title XIX of the Social Security Act, and any waivers thereof, to implement coverage for newly eligible individuals pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 1396d(y)(1)[2010] of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act and (2) begin the process of implementing a § 1115 demonstration project to transform the Medicaid program for newly eligible individuals pursuant to the provisions of 4.a.(1) and eligible individuals enrolled in the existing Medicaid program. No later than 150 days from the passage of House Bill 5001, DMAS shall submit the § 1115 demonstration waiver application to CMS for approval. If the State Plan amendments are affirmatively approved by CMS prior to the submission of the waiver, Medicaid coverage for newly eligible individuals may be implemented. If the State Plan amendment becomes effective without affirmative action by CMS, coverage may begin upon submission of the completed § 1115 demonstration waiver application, per CMS notification, but no later than January 1, 2019. If the demonstration waiver cannot be completed by 150 days, despite a good faith effort to complete the application, the department may request an extension from the Chairmen of the House Appropriations and Senate Finance Committees. The department shall provide updates on the progress of the State Plan amendments and demonstration waiver applications to the Chairmen of the House Appropriations and Senate Finance Committees, or their designees, upon request, and provide for participation in discussions with CMS staff. The department shall respond to all requests for information from CMS on the State Plan amendments and demonstration waiver applications in a timely manner.

“b. At least 10 days prior to the submission of the application for the waiver of Title XIX of the Social Security Act, the department shall notify the Chairmen of the House Appropriations and Senate Finance Committees of such pending application and provide a copy of the application. If the department receives an official letter from either Chairman raising an objection about the waiver during the 10-day period, the department shall make all reasonable attempts to address the objection and modify the waiver(s). If the department receives no objection, then the application may be submitted. Any waiver specifically authorized elsewhere in this item is not subject to this provision. Waiver renewals are not subject to the provisions of this paragraph.

“c. The Department of Medical Assistance Services shall include provisions to make referrals to job training, education and job placement assistance for all unemployed, able-bodied adult enrollees as allowed under current federal law or regulations through the State Plan amendments, contracts, or other policy changes. DMAS shall also include provisions to foster personal responsibility and prepare newly eligible enrollees for participation in commercial health insurance plans to include use of private health plans, premium support for employer-sponsored insurance, health and wellness accounts, appropriate utilization of hospital emergency room services, healthy behavior incentives, and enhanced fraud prevention efforts, among others through the State Plan amendments, contracts, or other policy changes.

“d. The demonstration project shall be designed to empower individuals to improve their health and well-being and gain employer sponsored coverage or other commercial health insurance coverage, while simultaneously ensuring the program’s long-term fiscal sustainability. The demonstration project shall include the following elements in the design:

“(i) two pathways for eligible individuals with incomes between 100 percent and 138 percent of the federal poverty level, including income disregards, to obtain health care coverage: enrollment in an existing Medicaid managed care plan, or premium assistance for the purchase of employer-sponsored health insurance coverage if cost effective. The plans will provide a comprehensive benefit package consistent with private market plans, compliant with all mandated essential health benefits, and inclusive of current Medicaid covered mental health and addiction recovery and treatment services. The demonstration shall include (1) the development of a health and wellness account for eligible individuals, comprised of participant contributions and state funds to be used to fund the health insurance premiums and to ensure funds are available for the enrollee to cover out-of-pocket expenses for the deductible, with the ability to roll over the funds from the account into succeeding years if not fully used. The monthly premium amount for the enrollee shall be set on a sliding scale based on monthly income, not to exceed two percent of monthly income, nor be less than $1 per month; (2) provisions for demonstration coverage to begin on the first day of the month following receipt of the premium payment or enrollment due to treatment of an acute illness; (3) provisions for institution of a grace period for premium payment, followed by a waiting period before re-enrollment if the premium is not paid by the participant or if the participant does not maintain continuous coverage; and (4) provisions to recover premium payments owed to the Commonwealth through debt set-off collections;

“(ii) provisions to enroll newly eligible individuals with incomes between 0 and 100 percent of the federal poverty level, including income disregards, in existing Medicaid managed care plans with existing Medicaid benefits or in employer-sponsored health insurance plans, if cost effective. Such newly eligible enrollees shall be subject to existing Medicaid cost sharing provisions;

“(iii) cost-sharing for eligible enrollees with incomes between 100 percent and 138 percent of the federal poverty level, including income disregards, designed to promote healthy behaviors such as the avoidance of tobacco use, and to encourage personal responsibility and accountability related to the utilization of health care services such as the appropriate use of emergency room services. However, such individuals who also meet the exemptions listed in (iv) shall not be subject to premium and copayment requirements more stringent than existing Medicaid law or regulations. Enrollees who comply with provisions of the demonstration program, including healthy behavior provisions, may receive a decrease in their monthly premiums and copayments, not to exceed 50 percent.

“(iv) the establishment of the Training, Education, Employment and Opportunity Program (TEEOP) for every able-bodied, working-age adult enrolled in the Medicaid program to enable enrollees to increase their health and well-being through community engagement leading to self-sufficiency. The TEEOP program shall not apply to: (1) children under the age of 18 or individuals under the age of 19 who are participating in secondary education; (2) individuals age 65 years and older; (3) individuals who qualify for medical assistance services due to blindness or disability, including individuals who receive services pursuant to a § 1915 waiver; (4) individuals residing in institutions; (5) individuals determined to be medically frail; (6) individuals diagnosed with serious mental illness; (7) pregnant and postpartum women; (8) former foster children under the age of 26; (9) individuals who are the primary caregiver for a dependent, including a dependent child or adult dependent with a disability; and (10) individuals who already meet the work requirements of the TANF or SNAP programs. The TEEOP shall comply with guidance from CMS regarding such programs and may include other exemptions that may be necessary to achieve the TEEOP’s goals of community engagement and improved health outcomes that are approved by CMS.

“The TEEOP shall include provisions for gradually escalating participation in training, education, employment and community engagement opportunities through the program as follows:

“a. beginning three months after enrollment, at least 20 hours per month;

“b. beginning six months after enrollment, at least 40 hours per month;

“c. beginning nine months after enrollment, at least 60 hours per month; and

“d. beginning 12 months after enrollment, at least 80 hours per month;

“The TEEOP shall also include provisions for satisfaction of the requirement for participation in training, education, employment and community engagement opportunities through participation in job skills training; job search activities in conformity with Virginia Employment and Commission guidelines; education related to employment; general education, including participation in a program of preparation for the General Education Development (GED) certification examination or community college courses leading to industry certifications or a STEM-H related degree or credential; vocational education and training; subsidized or unsubsidized employment; community work experience programs, community service or public service, excluding political activities, that can reasonably improve work readiness; or caregiving services for a non-dependent relative or other person with a chronic, disabling health condition.
The department may waive the requirement for participation in employment in areas of the Commonwealth with unemployment rates equal to or greater than 150 percent of the statewide average; however, requirements related to training, education and other community engagement opportunities shall not be waived in any area of the Commonwealth.

“The TEEOP shall work with Virginia Workforce Centers or One-Stops to provide services to Medicaid enrollees. Such services shall include career services for program enrollees, services to link enrollees with industry certification and credentialing programs, including the New Economy Workforce Credential Grant Program, and individualized case management services.

“The TEEOP shall, to the extent allowed under federal law, utilize federal and state funding available through the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program, the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, and other state and federal workforce development programs to support program enrollees.

“Unless exempt, enrollees shall be ineligible to receive Medicaid benefits if, during any three months of the 12-month period beginning on the first day of enrollment, they fail to meet the TEEOP requirements and they will not be permitted to re-enroll until the end of such 12-month period, unless the failure to comply or report compliance was the result of a catastrophic event or circumstances beyond the beneficiary’s control. However, enrollees shall be eligible to re-enroll in the program within such 12-month period upon demonstration of compliance with the TEEOP requirements.

“(v) monitoring and oversight of the use of health care services to ensure appropriate utilization;

“(vi) The Department of Medical Assistance Services shall develop a supportive employment and housing benefit targeted to high risk Medicaid beneficiaries with mental illness, substance use disorder, or other complex, chronic conditions who need intensive, ongoing support to obtain and maintain employment and stable housing.

“e. The State Plan amendment and the demonstration waiver program shall include (i) systems for determining eligibility for participation in the program, (ii) provisions for disenrollment if federal funding is reduced or terminated, and (iii) provisions for monitoring, evaluating, and assessing the effectiveness of the waiver program in improving the health and wellness of program participants and furthering the objectives of the Medicaid program.

“f. The department shall have the authority to promulgate emergency regulations to implement these changes within 280 days or less from the enactment date of House Bill 5001. The department shall have the authority to implement these changes prior to the completion of any regulatory process undertake in order to effect such changes.

“5. In the event that the increased federal medical assistance percentages for newly eligible individuals included in 42 U.S.C. § 1396d(y)(1)[2010] of the PPACA are modified through federal law or regulation from the methodology in effect on January 1, 2014, resulting in a reduction in federal medical assistance as determined by the department in consultation with the Department of Planning and Budget, the Department of Medical Assistance Services shall disenroll and eliminate coverage for individuals who obtained coverage through 42 U.S.C. § 1396d(y)(1) [2010] of the PPACA. The disenrollment process shall include written notification to affected Medicaid beneficiaries, Medicaid managed care plans, and other providers that coverage will cease as soon as allowable under federal law following the date the department is notified of a reduction in Federal Medical Assistance Percentage.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 313 QQ 3, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “a. Notwithstanding § 30-347, Code of Virginia, or any other provision of law, the Department of Medical Assistance Services shall have the authority to (1) amend the State Plan for Medical Assistance under Title XIX of the Social Security Act, and any waivers thereof, to implement coverage for newly eligible individuals pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 1396d(y)(1)[2010] of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act and (2) begin the process of implementing a § 1115 demonstration project to transform the Medicaid program for newly eligible individuals pursuant to the provisions of 4.c. and eligible individuals enrolled in the existing Medicaid program. DMAS shall submit the § 1115 demonstration waiver application to CMS for approval. The department shall provide updates on the progress of the State Plan amendments and demonstration waiver applications to the Chairmen of the House Appropriations and Senate Finance Committees, or their designees, upon request, and provide for participation in discussions with CMS staff. The department shall respond to all requests for information from CMS on the State Plan Amendments and demonstration waiver applications in a timely manner.

“b. The demonstration project shall include the following elements in the design: The Department of Medical Assistance Services shall develop a supportive employment and housing benefit targeted to high risk Medicaid beneficiaries with mental illness, substance use disorder, or other complex, chronic conditions who need intensive, ongoing support to obtain and maintain employment and stable housing.

“c. The department shall have the authority to promulgate emergency regulations to implement these changes within 280 days or less from the enactment date of this Act.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 313 QQ 4, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “In the event that the increased federal medical assistance percentages for newly eligible individuals included in 42 U.S.C. § 1396d(y)(1)[2010] of the PPACA are modified through federal law or regulation from the methodology in effect on January 1, 2014, resulting in a reduction in federal medical assistance as determined by the department in consultation with the Department of Planning and Budget, the Department of Medical Assistance Services shall disenroll and eliminate coverage for individuals who obtained coverage through 42 U.S.C. § 1396d(y)(1) [2010] of the PPACA. The disenrollment process shall include written notification to affected Medicaid beneficiaries, Medicaid managed care plans, and other providers that coverage will cease as soon as allowable under federal law following the date the department is notified of a reduction in Federal Medical Assistance Percentage.”

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations” for “Senate Finance Committee.” March 10, 2021.